Hawaii, session 2025, HB110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that supporting local agriculture and strengthening local food systems are a matter of statewide concern that can improve the resilience of Hawaii's economy, environment, culture, and public health.  The legislature further finds that setting clear and ambitious target goals for the purchase of locally grown food ensures that the State plays its role in supporting local farmers and guarantees that revenue derived from local produce remains in the State and feeds local people.  Act 175, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, established a programmatic goal for the department of education to provide a minimum of thirty per cent locally sourced food in Hawaii public school meals by 2030.  In addition, the legislature also passed Act 176, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, and Act 144, Session Laws of Hawaii 2022, which established five-year benchmarks ensuring a certain percentage of produce that is purchased by the department of education, department of health, department of public safety (now the department of corrections and rehabilitation), department of defense, and university of Hawaii system is locally grown. The legislature also finds that the existing goals set different standards for various state departments.  Specifically, pursuant to Act 175, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, the programmatic goal for the department of education is to locally source at least thirty per cent of food served in public schools by 2030, which is higher than other state departments.  The legislature believes that the goals to provide locally-sourced food should increase at a consistent and predictable pace across all pertinent state departments to avoid any confusion between departments; however, the legislature does recognize that benchmark goals for certain departments should be assessed on a more frequent basis than the department of education. The purpose of this Act is to resolve some of the discrepancies between the locally sourced food benchmarks for the department of education and those of other state entities. SECTION 2.  Section 27-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) The department of education, department of health, department of corrections and rehabilitation, department of defense, and [University] university of Hawaii system shall each ensure that a certain percentage of the food purchased for public schools, youth campuses, public hospitals, public prisons, and any purchases made directly by the [University] university of Hawaii for use in its academic programs, as applicable, is fresh local agricultural products and local value-added, processed, agricultural, or food products, as follows: (1)  By January 1, 2025, fresh local agricultural products and local value-added, processed, agricultural, or food products shall constitute a minimum of ten per cent of the total food purchased during each calendar year, as measured by the per cent of total food cost; provided that the department of education shall be exempt from the requirements of this paragraph; (2)  By January 1, 2030, fresh local agricultural products and local value-added, processed, agricultural, or food products shall constitute a minimum of eighteen per cent of the total food purchased during each calendar year, as measured by the per cent of total food cost; provided that the department of education shall be exempt from the requirements of this paragraph and instead shall be subject to the requirements in section 302A-405.6(a); (3)  By January 1, 2035, fresh local agricultural products and local value-added, processed, agricultural, or food products shall constitute a minimum of twenty-six per cent of the total food purchased during each calendar year, as measured by the per cent of total food cost; provided that the department of education shall be exempt from the requirements of this paragraph; (4)  By January 1, 2040, fresh local agricultural products and local value-added, processed, agricultural, or food products shall constitute a minimum of thirty-four per cent of the total food purchased during each calendar year, as measured by the per cent of total food cost; (5)  By January 1, 2045, fresh local agricultural products and local value-added, processed, agricultural, or food products shall constitute a minimum of forty-two per cent of the total food purchased during each calendar year, as measured by the per cent of total food cost; and (6)  By January 1, 2050, fresh local agricultural products and local value-added, processed, agricultural, or food products shall constitute a minimum of fifty per cent of the total food purchased during each calendar year, as measured by the per cent of total food cost." SECTION 3.  Section 302A-405.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending its title and subsection (a) to read as follows: "[[]§302A-405.6[]]  Farm to school meals.  (a)  [By 2030, the department shall meet the local farm to school meal goal that thirty per cent of food served in public schools shall consist of locally sourced products, as measured by the percentage of the total cost of food.] The department shall ensure that by January 1, 2030, fresh local agricultural products and local value-added processed, agricultural, or food products shall constitute a minimum of thirty per cent of the total food purchased during each calendar year, as measured by the per cent of total food cost." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________